Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 475B.759, as amended by section  10, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020)), is amended to read:
475B.759. (1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys  available in the
Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Before making other  transfers of moneys required by this section, the department
shall transfer quarterly to the Drug Treatment and Recovery  Services Fund all moneys in
the Oregon Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000.
[(b)] (c) Subject to subsection (4) of  this section, and after making the transfer of moneys re-
quired by [ subsection (7) of this  section ] paragraph (b) of this subsection , the department shall
transfer quarterly 20 percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to  the cities of this state in
the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  shares that reflect the popu-
lation of each city of this state that  is not exempt from this paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)
of this section compared to the population  of all cities of this state that are not exempt from this
paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a)  of this section, as determined by Portland State University
under ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number
of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last  business day
of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each city com-
pared to the number of licenses  held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on
the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the account must be transferred to counties in the following
shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses held pursuant
to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day  of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer
for all premises located in each county compared to the total commercially available  area of all
Enrolled House Bill 3295 (HB 3295-A) Page 1
grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.070 on the
last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent  of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the number of li-
censes held pursuant to ORS 475B.090,  475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business day of the cal-
endar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises  located in each county compared to
the number  of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.105 on the last business
day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
[(c)] (d) After making the transfer of moneys required by [ subsection (7) of this  section, eighty ]
paragraph (b) of this subsection, 80  percent of the remaining moneys  in the Oregon Marijuana
Account must be used as follows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for which
moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account  must be used solely for mental health treat-
ment or for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes for which
moneys in the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys  in the account must be used solely for purposes related to al-
cohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has an  ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.070,  475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(A)] (3)(c)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issu-
ance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under
subsection [ (3)(b)(B)(i)] (3)(c)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A  county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which issu-
ance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100  or 475B.105 is required is not eligible to receive
transfers of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(B)(ii)] (3)(c)(B)(ii)  of this section.
(d)(A) Paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection do  not apply to a county ordinance
adopted on or after January 1, 2018, that prohibits the establishment of a premises  for which
a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105  is required but allows in the
unincorporated area of the  county the continued operation of an existing premises for which
a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required.
(B) A county that adopts an ordinance  described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
shall certify the adoption of the ordinance under subsection (6) of this section.
(5)(a) A city or county that is ineligible under subsection (4) of this section  to receive a transfer
of moneys from the Oregon Marijuana Account during a given quarter but has received  a transfer
of moneys for that quarter shall return the amount transferred to the Department of  Revenue, with
interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. An ineligible city or county may  vol-
untarily transfer the moneys to the Department of Revenue immediately upon receipt of  the ineli-
gible transfer.
(b) If the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services determines that a city
or county received a transfer of moneys under  subsection [ (3)(b)] (3)(c) of this section but was in-
eligible to receive that transfer under subsection (4) of this  section, the director shall provide notice
to the ineligible city or county and order the city or county to return the amount  received to the
Department of Revenue, with interest as described under paragraph (f) of this subsection. A city  or
county may appeal the order within 30 days of the date of the order  under the procedures for a
contested case under ORS chapter 183.
(c) As soon as the order under  paragraph (b) of this subsection becomes final, the director shall
notify the Department of Revenue and the ineligible city or county. Upon notification,  the Depart-
ment of Revenue immediately shall proceed to collect the amount stated in the notice.
(d) The Department of Revenue shall have  the benefit of all laws of the state pertaining to the
collection of income and excise  taxes and may proceed to collect the amounts described in the no-
Enrolled House Bill 3295 (HB 3295-A) Page 2
tice under paragraph (c) of this subsection. An assessment of tax is not necessary  and the collection
described in this subsection is not precluded by any statute of limitations.
(e) If a city or county is subject  to an order to return moneys from an ineligible transfer, the
city or county  shall be denied any further relief in connection with the ineligible transfer on or after
the date that the order becomes final.
(f) Interest under this section shall accrue at the  rate established in ORS 305.220 beginning on
the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(g) Both the moneys  and the interest collected from or returned by an ineligible city or county
shall be redistributed to the cities or counties that were eligible to receive  a transfer under sub-
section [ (3)(b)] (3)(c) of this section on the date the ineligible transfer was made.
(6)(a) Not later than July 1 of each year, each  city and county in this state shall certify with
the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services whether the city or county has an ordinance
prohibiting the establishment of a premises  for which issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070,
475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.105 is required and whether the county has an ordinance described
in subsection (4)(d) of  this section . The certification shall be made concurrently with the certif-
ications under ORS 221.770, in a form and manner prescribed by the Oregon  Department of Admin-
istrative  Services.
(b) If a city fails to comply with this subsection, the city is not eligible to receive  transfers of
moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(A)] (3)(c)(A) of this section. If a county  fails to comply with this
subsection, the county is not eligible to receive transfers  of moneys under subsection [ (3)(b)(B)]
(3)(c)(B) of this section.
(c) A city or county that repeals an ordinance as  provided in ORS 475B.496 shall file an updated
certification with the Oregon Department of Administrative Services in a form  and manner pre-
scribed by the department, noting the effective date  of the change. A city or county that repeals an
ordinance as provided in ORS 475B.496 is eligible  to receive quarterly transfers of moneys under
this section for quarters where the repeal is effective for the entire quarter and the updated  certif-
ication was filed at least 30 days before the date of transfer.
[(7) Before  making the transfer of moneys required by subsection (3) of this section, the department
shall transfer quarterly  to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund all moneys in the Oregon
Marijuana Account in excess of $11,250,000. ]
SECTION 2.  Section 5,  chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund is established in the State  Treas-
ury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Drug Treatment and
Recovery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant  to section 6 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot
Measure 110 (2020));
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS  475B.759 [ (7)]
(3)(b); and[,]
(d) All other moneys deposited [ in] into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Health Authority for
the purposes set forth in section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
[(4) Unexpended moneys in the fund may not lapse and shall be carried  forward and may be used
without regard to fiscal year or biennium. ]
[(5)(a)] (4)(a) Pursuant to subsection (2)(b)  of this section, the Legislative Assembly shall ap-
propriate or transfer to the fund an amount sufficient to fully fund  the grants program required by
section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The total amount deposited and transferred into the fund shall not be  less than $57 million
for the first year [ this Act ] chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  is in effect.
Enrolled House Bill 3295 (HB 3295-A) Page 3
(c) In each subsequent year, [ that] the minimum transfer  amount set forth  in paragraph (b)
of this  subsection [ (5)(b) of this section ] shall be increased by not less than the sum of :
[(i)] (A) $57 million multiplied by  the percentage [ (if any) ], if any,  by which the monthly av-
eraged U.S. City Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending [ December]
August 31  of the prior calendar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the cal-
endar year 2020; and[ ,]
[(ii)] (B) [ An amount not less than  the increase ] The annual increase, if any,  in moneys dis-
tributed pursuant to ORS 475B.759 [ (7)] (3)(b).
SECTION 3. (1) Prior to adopting an ordinance described in ORS 475B.759 (4)(d), a county
shall convene a cannabis  advisory panel to provide recommendations to the county commis-
sion regarding the county’s regulation of marijuana and use of moneys transferred to the
county under ORS 475B.759 (4). The county commission shall appoint the following  members
to the county cannabis advisory panel:
(a) A  person who holds a license issued under ORS 475B.070 for a premises located in the
county;
(b) A  person who holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105 for a premises located in the
county;
(c) A designee of the county sheriff;
(d) A designee of the county commission;
(e) A member of the public;
(f) A watermaster, as described in ORS 540.020,  who is appointed for a water district in,
partially in or near the county; and
(g) A representative of the county who is knowledgeable about  economic development in
the county.
(2) A county cannabis advisory  panel shall provide recommendations to the county com-
mission on at least the following:
(a) The use of moneys transferred to the county under ORS 475B.759;
(b) Increases in public safety measures related to marijuana use and marijuana  entities
in the county; and
(c) Issues presented  by the production, processing, wholesaling and distribution of
marijuana in the unincorporated area subject to the jurisdiction of the county.
(3)(a) A county cannabis  advisory panel shall meet at least quarterly during the time in
which the  county receives transfers of moneys under ORS 475B.759, beginning not later than
the date on  which an ordinance described under ORS 475B.759 (4)(d) is proposed by the
county.
(b) A county that adopts  an ordinance described in ORS 475B.759 (4)(d) and that does not
appoint a county cannabis advisory panel under this section is not eligible to receive trans-
fers of moneys under ORS 475B.759.
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding section 3 (3) of  this 2021 Act, a county that adopts an or-
dinance described in ORS 475B.759 (4)(d) between January 1, 2018, and September 1, 2021, is
eligible to receive transfers of  moneys under ORS 475B.759 when the county appoints a
county cannabis advisory panel, as described in section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) Sections 3 and 4 of  this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS 475B.759
and section 5, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), by sections 1 and 2
of this 2021 Act become operative on January 1, 2022.
(2) The Department of Revenue and a  county may take any action before the operative
date specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the department and
the county to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department and  the county
by sections 3 and 4 of this 2021 Act and the amendments to ORS  475B.759 and section 5,
chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), by sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3295 (HB 3295-A) Page 4
SECTION 6. This 2021 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3295 (HB 3295-A) Page 5